test/src/morphology/V-kuullad_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - kuullâd: # Verb 'to hear' - full paradigm
     kuullâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuulam
     kuullâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kuulak
     kuullâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kooll
     kuullâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kuullâp
     kuullâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kuullveˊted
     kuullâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: koˊlle
     kuullâd+V+Ind+Prs+4: kuulât
     kuullâd+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kuul
     kuullâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kuˊllem
     kuullâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kuˊlliǩ
     kuullâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kuuli
     kuullâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [kuulim, kuulin]
     kuullâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kuulid
     kuullâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kuˊlle
     kuullâd+V+Ind+Prt+4: kuˊlleš
     kuullâd+V+Pot+Sg1: kuulžem
     kuullâd+V+Pot+Sg2: kuulžiǩ
     kuullâd+V+Pot+Sg3: kuulâž
     kuullâd+V+Pot+Pl1: kuulžep
     kuullâd+V+Pot+Pl2: kuulžid
     kuullâd+V+Pot+Pl3: kuulže
     kuullâd+V+Pot+4: kuulžet
     kuullâd+V+Pot+ConNeg: kuulže
     kuullâd+V+Cond+Sg1: kuulčem
     kuullâd+V+Cond+Sg2: kuulčiǩ
     kuullâd+V+Cond+Sg3: kuulči
     kuullâd+V+Cond+Pl1: kuulčep
     kuullâd+V+Cond+Pl2: kuulčid
     kuullâd+V+Cond+Pl3: kuulče
     kuullâd+V+Cond+4: kuulčeš
     kuullâd+V+Cond+ConNeg: kuulče
     kuullâd+V+Imp+Sg2: kuul
     kuullâd+V+Imp+Sg3: koolas
     kuullâd+V+Imp+Pl1: kuullâp
     kuullâd+V+Imp+Pl2: kuullâd
     kuullâd+V+Imp+Pl3: kollaz
     kuullâd+V+Imp+ConNeg: kullu
     kuullâd+V+ActEss: kuullmen
     kuullâd+V+Action: kuullâm
     kuullâd+V+PrsPrc: kuulli
     kuullâd+V+PrfPrc: kuullâm
     kuullâd+V+Pass+PrfPrc: kullum
     kuullâd+V+VAbess: [kuulkâni, kuulkani, kuulǩeânai]
     kuullâd+V+GerTemp: kuuleen
     kuullâd+V+GerInstr: kuuleeˊl
     kuullâd+V+Inf: kuullâd
